District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-407

Penalties for violation of chapter.

Repealed.

History

June 29, 1938, ch. 809, § 7
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 954, Pub. L. 85-792,§ 2
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 437, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 44-307.
1973 Ed., § 44-307.